Tennessee, session 114, SB1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (43).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-253(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Sequatchie Valley educational development agency, created by § 64-1-501;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1537
010095
- 1 -